dictionaries/fr_FR-reformed/fr_FR-reformed.aff
FLAG long
SFX c3 Y 503
SFX c3 er er/25 er 22
SFX c3 er ant/25 [^cg]er 23
SFX c3 écer éçant/25 écer 23
SFX c3 éger égeant/25 éger 23
SFX c3 ébrer èbre/26 ébrer 28
SFX c3 écer èce/26 écer 28
SFX c3 écher èche/26 écher 28
SFX c3 écrer ècre/26 écrer 28
SFX c3 éder ède/26 éder 28
SFX c3 éger ège/26 éger 28
SFX c3 égler ègle/26 égler 28
SFX c3 égner ègne/26 égner 28
SFX c3 égrer ègre/26 égrer 28
SFX c3 éguer ègue/26 éguer 28
SFX c3 éler èle/26 éler 28
SFX c3 émer ème/26 émer 28
SFX c3 éner ène/26 éner 28
SFX c3 éper èpe/26 éper 28
SFX c3 équer èque/26 équer 28
SFX c3 érer ère/26 érer 28
SFX c3 éser èse/26 éser 28
SFX c3 éter ète/26 éter 28
SFX c3 étrer ètre/26 étrer 28
SFX c3 évrer èvre/26 évrer 28
SFX c3 éyer èye/26 éyer 28
SFX c3 ébrer èbres/27 ébrer 29
SFX c3 écer èces/27 écer 29
SFX c3 écher èches/27 écher 29
SFX c3 écrer ècres/27 écrer 29
SFX c3 éder èdes/27 éder 29
SFX c3 éger èges/27 éger 29
SFX c3 égler ègles/27 égler 29
SFX c3 égner ègnes/27 égner 29
SFX c3 égrer ègres/27 égrer 29
SFX c3 éguer ègues/27 éguer 29
SFX c3 éler èles/27 éler 29
SFX c3 émer èmes/27 émer 29
SFX c3 éner ènes/27 éner 29
SFX c3 éper èpes/27 éper 29
SFX c3 équer èques/27 équer 29
SFX c3 érer ères/27 érer 29
SFX c3 éser èses/27 éser 29
SFX c3 éter ètes/27 éter 29
SFX c3 étrer ètres/27 étrer 29
SFX c3 évrer èvres/27 évrer 29
SFX c3 éyer èyes/27 éyer 29
SFX c3 ébrer èbre/28 ébrer 30
SFX c3 écer èce/28 écer 30
SFX c3 écher èche/28 écher 30
SFX c3 écrer ècre/28 écrer 30
SFX c3 éder ède/28 éder 30
SFX c3 éger ège/28 éger 30
SFX c3 égler ègle/28 égler 30
SFX c3 égner ègne/28 égner 30
SFX c3 égrer ègre/28 égrer 30
SFX c3 éguer ègue/28 éguer 30
SFX c3 éler èle/28 éler 30
SFX c3 émer ème/28 émer 30
SFX c3 éner ène/28 éner 30
SFX c3 éper èpe/28 éper 30
SFX c3 équer èque/28 équer 30
SFX c3 érer ère/28 érer 30
SFX c3 éser èse/28 éser 30
SFX c3 éter ète/28 éter 30
SFX c3 étrer ètre/28 étrer 30
SFX c3 évrer èvre/28 évrer 30
SFX c3 éyer èye/28 éyer 30
SFX c3 er ons [^cg]er 31
SFX c3 écer éçons écer 31
SFX c3 éger égeons éger 31
SFX c3 er ez er 32
SFX c3 ébrer èbrent/28 ébrer 33
SFX c3 écer ècent/28 écer 33
SFX c3 écher èchent/28 écher 33
SFX c3 écrer ècrent/28 écrer 33
SFX c3 éder èdent/28 éder 33
SFX c3 éger ègent/28 éger 33
SFX c3 égler èglent/28 égler 33
SFX c3 égner ègnent/28 égner 33
SFX c3 égrer ègrent/28 égrer 33
SFX c3 éguer èguent/28 éguer 33
SFX c3 éler èlent/28 éler 33
SFX c3 émer èment/28 émer 33
SFX c3 éner ènent/28 éner 33
SFX c3 éper èpent/28 éper 33
SFX c3 équer èquent/28 équer 33
SFX c3 érer èrent/28 érer 33
SFX c3 éser èsent/28 éser 33
SFX c3 éter ètent/28 éter 33
SFX c3 étrer ètrent/28 étrer 33
SFX c3 évrer èvrent/28 évrer 33
SFX c3 éyer èyent/28 éyer 33
SFX c3 er ais/26 [^cg]er 34
SFX c3 écer éçais/26 écer 34
SFX c3 éger égeais/26 éger 34
SFX c3 er ais/27 [^cg]er 35
SFX c3 écer éçais/27 écer 35
SFX c3 éger égeais/27 éger 35
SFX c3 er ait/28 [^cg]er 36
SFX c3 écer éçait/28 écer 36
SFX c3 éger égeait/28 éger 36
SFX c3 er ions er 37
SFX c3 er iez er 38
SFX c3 er aient/28 [^cg]er 39
SFX c3 écer éçaient/28 écer 39
SFX c3 éger égeaient/28 éger 39
SFX c3 er ai/26 [^cg]er 40
SFX c3 écer éçai/26 écer 40
SFX c3 éger égeai/26 éger 40
SFX c3 er as/27 [^cg]er 42
SFX c3 écer éças/27 écer 42
SFX c3 éger égeas/27 éger 42
SFX c3 er a/28 [^cg]er 43
SFX c3 écer éça/28 écer 43
SFX c3 éger égea/28 éger 43
SFX c3 er âmes [^cg]er 44
SFX c3 écer éçâmes écer 44
SFX c3 éger égeâmes éger 44
SFX c3 er âtes [^cg]er 45
SFX c3 écer éçâtes écer 45
SFX c3 éger égeâtes éger 45
SFX c3 er èrent/28 er 46
SFX c3 ébrer èbrerai/26 ébrer 47
SFX c3 écer ècerai/26 écer 47
SFX c3 écher ècherai/26 écher 47
SFX c3 écrer ècrerai/26 écrer 47
SFX c3 éder èderai/26 éder 47
SFX c3 éger ègerai/26 éger 47
SFX c3 égler èglerai/26 égler 47
SFX c3 égner ègnerai/26 égner 47
SFX c3 égrer ègrerai/26 égrer 47
SFX c3 éguer èguerai/26 éguer 47
SFX c3 éler èlerai/26 éler 47
SFX c3 émer èmerai/26 émer 47
SFX c3 éner ènerai/26 éner 47
SFX c3 éper èperai/26 éper 47
SFX c3 équer èquerai/26 équer 47
SFX c3 érer èrerai/26 érer 47
SFX c3 éser èserai/26 éser 47
SFX c3 éter èterai/26 éter 47
SFX c3 étrer ètrerai/26 étrer 47
SFX c3 évrer èvrerai/26 évrer 47
SFX c3 éyer èyerai/26 éyer 47
SFX c3 ébrer èbreras/27 ébrer 48
SFX c3 écer èceras/27 écer 48
SFX c3 écher ècheras/27 écher 48
SFX c3 écrer ècreras/27 écrer 48
SFX c3 éder èderas/27 éder 48
SFX c3 éger ègeras/27 éger 48
SFX c3 égler ègleras/27 égler 48
SFX c3 égner ègneras/27 égner 48
SFX c3 égrer ègreras/27 égrer 48
SFX c3 éguer ègueras/27 éguer 48
SFX c3 éler èleras/27 éler 48
SFX c3 émer èmeras/27 émer 48
SFX c3 éner èneras/27 éner 48
SFX c3 éper èperas/27 éper 48
SFX c3 équer èqueras/27 équer 48
SFX c3 érer èreras/27 érer 48
SFX c3 éser èseras/27 éser 48
SFX c3 éter èteras/27 éter 48
SFX c3 étrer ètreras/27 étrer 48
SFX c3 évrer èvreras/27 évrer 48
SFX c3 éyer èyeras/27 éyer 48
SFX c3 ébrer èbrera/28 ébrer 49
SFX c3 écer ècera/28 écer 49
SFX c3 écher èchera/28 écher 49
SFX c3 écrer ècrera/28 écrer 49
SFX c3 éder èdera/28 éder 49
SFX c3 éger ègera/28 éger 49
SFX c3 égler èglera/28 égler 49
SFX c3 égner ègnera/28 égner 49
SFX c3 égrer ègrera/28 égrer 49
SFX c3 éguer èguera/28 éguer 49
SFX c3 éler èlera/28 éler 49
SFX c3 émer èmera/28 émer 49
SFX c3 éner ènera/28 éner 49
SFX c3 éper èpera/28 éper 49
SFX c3 équer èquera/28 équer 49
SFX c3 érer èrera/28 érer 49
SFX c3 éser èsera/28 éser 49
SFX c3 éter ètera/28 éter 49
SFX c3 étrer ètrera/28 étrer 49
SFX c3 évrer èvrera/28 évrer 49
SFX c3 éyer èyera/28 éyer 49
SFX c3 ébrer èbrerons ébrer 50
SFX c3 écer ècerons écer 50
SFX c3 écher ècherons écher 50
SFX c3 écrer ècrerons écrer 50
SFX c3 éder èderons éder 50
SFX c3 éger ègerons éger 50
SFX c3 égler èglerons égler 50
SFX c3 égner ègnerons égner 50
SFX c3 égrer ègrerons égrer 50
SFX c3 éguer èguerons éguer 50
SFX c3 éler èlerons éler 50
SFX c3 émer èmerons émer 50
SFX c3 éner ènerons éner 50
SFX c3 éper èperons éper 50
SFX c3 équer èquerons équer 50
SFX c3 érer èrerons érer 50
SFX c3 éser èserons éser 50
SFX c3 éter èterons éter 50
SFX c3 étrer ètrerons étrer 50
SFX c3 évrer èvrerons évrer 50
SFX c3 éyer èyerons éyer 50
SFX c3 ébrer èbrerez ébrer 51
SFX c3 écer ècerez écer 51
SFX c3 écher ècherez écher 51
SFX c3 écrer ècrerez écrer 51
SFX c3 éder èderez éder 51
SFX c3 éger ègerez éger 51
SFX c3 égler èglerez égler 51
SFX c3 égner ègnerez égner 51
SFX c3 égrer ègrerez égrer 51
SFX c3 éguer èguerez éguer 51
SFX c3 éler èlerez éler 51
SFX c3 émer èmerez émer 51
SFX c3 éner ènerez éner 51
SFX c3 éper èperez éper 51
SFX c3 équer èquerez équer 51
SFX c3 érer èrerez érer 51
SFX c3 éser èserez éser 51
SFX c3 éter èterez éter 51
SFX c3 étrer ètrerez étrer 51
SFX c3 évrer èvrerez évrer 51
SFX c3 éyer èyerez éyer 51
SFX c3 ébrer èbreront/28 ébrer 52
SFX c3 écer èceront/28 écer 52
SFX c3 écher ècheront/28 écher 52
SFX c3 écrer ècreront/28 écrer 52
SFX c3 éder èderont/28 éder 52
SFX c3 éger ègeront/28 éger 52
SFX c3 égler ègleront/28 égler 52
SFX c3 égner ègneront/28 égner 52
SFX c3 égrer ègreront/28 égrer 52
SFX c3 éguer ègueront/28 éguer 52
SFX c3 éler èleront/28 éler 52
SFX c3 émer èmeront/28 émer 52
SFX c3 éner èneront/28 éner 52
SFX c3 éper èperont/28 éper 52
SFX c3 équer èqueront/28 équer 52
SFX c3 érer èreront/28 érer 52
SFX c3 éser èseront/28 éser 52
SFX c3 éter èteront/28 éter 52
SFX c3 étrer ètreront/28 étrer 52
SFX c3 évrer èvreront/28 évrer 52
SFX c3 éyer èyeront/28 éyer 52
SFX c3 ébrer èbrerais/26 ébrer 53
SFX c3 écer ècerais/26 écer 53
SFX c3 écher ècherais/26 écher 53
SFX c3 écrer ècrerais/26 écrer 53
SFX c3 éder èderais/26 éder 53
SFX c3 éger ègerais/26 éger 53
SFX c3 égler èglerais/26 égler 53
SFX c3 égner ègnerais/26 égner 53
SFX c3 égrer ègrerais/26 égrer 53
SFX c3 éguer èguerais/26 éguer 53
SFX c3 éler èlerais/26 éler 53
SFX c3 émer èmerais/26 émer 53
SFX c3 éner ènerais/26 éner 53
SFX c3 éper èperais/26 éper 53
SFX c3 équer èquerais/26 équer 53
SFX c3 érer èrerais/26 érer 53
SFX c3 éser èserais/26 éser 53
SFX c3 éter èterais/26 éter 53
SFX c3 étrer ètrerais/26 étrer 53
SFX c3 évrer èvrerais/26 évrer 53
SFX c3 éyer èyerais/26 éyer 53
SFX c3 ébrer èbrerais/27 ébrer 54
SFX c3 écer ècerais/27 écer 54
SFX c3 écher ècherais/27 écher 54
SFX c3 écrer ècrerais/27 écrer 54
SFX c3 éder èderais/27 éder 54
SFX c3 éger ègerais/27 éger 54
SFX c3 égler èglerais/27 égler 54
SFX c3 égner ègnerais/27 égner 54
SFX c3 égrer ègrerais/27 égrer 54
SFX c3 éguer èguerais/27 éguer 54
SFX c3 éler èlerais/27 éler 54
SFX c3 émer èmerais/27 émer 54
SFX c3 éner ènerais/27 éner 54
SFX c3 éper èperais/27 éper 54
SFX c3 équer èquerais/27 équer 54
SFX c3 érer èrerais/27 érer 54
SFX c3 éser èserais/27 éser 54
SFX c3 éter èterais/27 éter 54
SFX c3 étrer ètrerais/27 étrer 54
SFX c3 évrer èvrerais/27 évrer 54
SFX c3 éyer èyerais/27 éyer 54
SFX c3 ébrer èbrerait/28 ébrer 55
SFX c3 écer ècerait/28 écer 55
SFX c3 écher ècherait/28 écher 55
SFX c3 écrer ècrerait/28 écrer 55
SFX c3 éder èderait/28 éder 55
SFX c3 éger ègerait/28 éger 55
SFX c3 égler èglerait/28 égler 55
SFX c3 égner ègnerait/28 égner 55
SFX c3 égrer ègrerait/28 égrer 55
SFX c3 éguer èguerait/28 éguer 55
SFX c3 éler èlerait/28 éler 55
SFX c3 émer èmerait/28 émer 55
SFX c3 éner ènerait/28 éner 55
SFX c3 éper èperait/28 éper 55
SFX c3 équer èquerait/28 équer 55
SFX c3 érer èrerait/28 érer 55
SFX c3 éser èserait/28 éser 55
SFX c3 éter èterait/28 éter 55
SFX c3 étrer ètrerait/28 étrer 55
SFX c3 évrer èvrerait/28 évrer 55
SFX c3 éyer èyerait/28 éyer 55
SFX c3 ébrer èbrerions ébrer 56
SFX c3 écer ècerions écer 56
SFX c3 écher ècherions écher 56
SFX c3 écrer ècrerions écrer 56
SFX c3 éder èderions éder 56
SFX c3 éger ègerions éger 56
SFX c3 égler èglerions égler 56
SFX c3 égner ègnerions égner 56
SFX c3 égrer ègrerions égrer 56
SFX c3 éguer èguerions éguer 56
SFX c3 éler èlerions éler 56
SFX c3 émer èmerions émer 56
SFX c3 éner ènerions éner 56
SFX c3 éper èperions éper 56
SFX c3 équer èquerions équer 56
SFX c3 érer èrerions érer 56
SFX c3 éser èserions éser 56
SFX c3 éter èterions éter 56
SFX c3 étrer ètrerions étrer 56
SFX c3 évrer èvrerions évrer 56
SFX c3 éyer èyerions éyer 56
SFX c3 ébrer èbreriez ébrer 57
SFX c3 écer èceriez écer 57
SFX c3 écher ècheriez écher 57
SFX c3 écrer ècreriez écrer 57
SFX c3 éder èderiez éder 57
SFX c3 éger ègeriez éger 57
SFX c3 égler ègleriez égler 57
SFX c3 égner ègneriez égner 57
SFX c3 égrer ègreriez égrer 57
SFX c3 éguer ègueriez éguer 57
SFX c3 éler èleriez éler 57
SFX c3 émer èmeriez émer 57
SFX c3 éner èneriez éner 57
SFX c3 éper èperiez éper 57
SFX c3 équer èqueriez équer 57
SFX c3 érer èreriez érer 57
SFX c3 éser èseriez éser 57
SFX c3 éter èteriez éter 57
SFX c3 étrer ètreriez étrer 57
SFX c3 évrer èvreriez évrer 57
SFX c3 éyer èyeriez éyer 57
SFX c3 ébrer èbreraient/28 ébrer 58
SFX c3 écer èceraient/28 écer 58
SFX c3 écher ècheraient/28 écher 58
SFX c3 écrer ècreraient/28 écrer 58
SFX c3 éder èderaient/28 éder 58
SFX c3 éger ègeraient/28 éger 58
SFX c3 égler ègleraient/28 égler 58
SFX c3 égner ègneraient/28 égner 58
SFX c3 égrer ègreraient/28 égrer 58
SFX c3 éguer ègueraient/28 éguer 58
SFX c3 éler èleraient/28 éler 58
SFX c3 émer èmeraient/28 émer 58
SFX c3 éner èneraient/28 éner 58
SFX c3 éper èperaient/28 éper 58
SFX c3 équer èqueraient/28 équer 58
SFX c3 érer èreraient/28 érer 58
SFX c3 éser èseraient/28 éser 58
SFX c3 éter èteraient/28 éter 58
SFX c3 étrer ètreraient/28 étrer 58
SFX c3 évrer èvreraient/28 évrer 58
SFX c3 éyer èyeraient/28 éyer 58
SFX c3 ébrer èbre/26 ébrer 59
SFX c3 écer èce/26 écer 59
SFX c3 écher èche/26 écher 59
SFX c3 écrer ècre/26 écrer 59
SFX c3 éder ède/26 éder 59
SFX c3 éger ège/26 éger 59
SFX c3 égler ègle/26 égler 59
SFX c3 égner ègne/26 égner 59
SFX c3 égrer ègre/26 égrer 59
SFX c3 éguer ègue/26 éguer 59
SFX c3 éler èle/26 éler 59
SFX c3 émer ème/26 émer 59
SFX c3 éner ène/26 éner 59
SFX c3 éper èpe/26 éper 59
SFX c3 équer èque/26 équer 59
SFX c3 érer ère/26 érer 59
SFX c3 éser èse/26 éser 59
SFX c3 éter ète/26 éter 59
SFX c3 étrer ètre/26 étrer 59
SFX c3 évrer èvre/26 évrer 59
SFX c3 éyer èye/26 éyer 59
